Florida, session 2026, SB1378.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 25 26 Section 1.âPresent subsections (1) through (4) of section 27 316.194, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as subsections (2) 28 through (5), respectively, a new subsection (1) is added to that 29 section, and paragraph (b) of present subsection (3) of that 30 section is amended, to read: 31 316.194âStopping, standing or parking outside of 32 municipalities.â 33 (1)âAs used in this section, the term âabandoned vehicleâ 34 means a vehicle that is in a state of disuse, neglect, or 35 abandonment. The term includes a vehicle without a license 36 plate, a vehicle with a license plate that is not registered to 37 the vehicle, a vehicle that does not have a registration sticker 38 affixed to the license plate, or a vehicle that has a 39 registration sticker affixed to the license plate which has been 40 expired for at least 90 days. Evidence of disuse, neglect, or 41 abandonment includes, but is not limited to, the vehicle being 42 wrecked and inoperative; the vehicle being inoperative as 43 evidenced by vegetation growing under the vehicle as high as the 44 vehicle body or frame; refuse or debris collected underneath the 45 vehicle; the vehicle being used solely for storage purposes; the 46 vehicle having major and visible parts that are dismantled; if 47 the vehicle is partially dismantled, the vehicle having no 48 engine, transmission, or other major and visible parts; the 49 vehicle being incapable of functioning as a vehicle in its 50 present state; the vehicle having only nominal salvage value; or 51 the vehicle being in any physical state rendering it 52 inoperative. If the primary apparent evidence of disuse, 53 neglect, or abandonment is vegetation growing under the vehicle, 54 an enforcement officer must use his or her training and 55 experience to determine whether, under the totality of the 56 circumstances, the vehicle is in a state of evident disuse, 57 neglect, or abandonment. 58 (4)(3) 59 (b)âOfficers and traffic accident investigation officers 60 may provide for the removal of any abandoned vehicle to the 61 nearest garage or other place of safety, cost of such removal to 62 be a lien against the motor vehicle, when an abandoned vehicle 63 is found unattended upon a bridge or causeway or in a any 64 tunnel, or on a any public highway in any of the following 65 instances: 66 1.âWhere the such vehicle constitutes an obstruction of 67 traffic or blocks visibility such that it is an egregious safety 68 hazard.; 69 2.âWhere the such vehicle is inoperative and has been 70 parked or stored on the public right-of-way for a period 71 exceeding 48 hours., in other than designated parking areas, and 72 is within 30 feet of the pavement edge; and 73 3.âWhere an operative vehicle has been parked or stored on 74 the public right-of-way for a period exceeding 10 days, in other 75 than designated parking areas, and is more than 30 feet from the 76 pavement edge. However, the agency removing such vehicle is 77 shall be required to report same to the Department of Highway 78 Safety and Motor Vehicles within 24 hours of such removal. 79 80 Before removal of a vehicle under subparagraph 2. or 81 subparagraph 3., a notice that describes the violation and 82 provides the time period after which the vehicle will be removed 83 must be attached to the vehicle in a conspicuous place. 84 Section 2.âSection 320.261, Florida Statutes, is amended to 85 read: 86 320.261âAttaching registration license plate not assigned 87 unlawful; penalty.â 88 (1)âA Any person may not who knowingly attach attaches to a 89 any motor vehicle or mobile home a any registration license 90 plate, or who knowingly attach a attaches any validation sticker 91 or mobile home sticker to a registration license plate, which 92 plate or sticker was not issued and assigned or lawfully 93 transferred to such vehicle or mobile home. A person who 94 violates this subsection commits, is guilty of a misdemeanor of 95 the second degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082 or s. 96 775.083. 97 (2)âA person who operates a motor vehicle with knowledge 98 that the vehicle bears a registration license plate or 99 validation sticker that was not issued and assigned or lawfully 100 transferred to such vehicle commits a misdemeanor of the first 101 degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082 or s. 775.083. 102 (3)(a)âFor purposes of this section, the element of 103 knowledge is satisfied if the person: 104 1.âAdmits to knowingly attaching or knowing about the 105 attachment of the registration license plate, validation 106 sticker, or mobile home sticker; or 107 2.âHas previously been charged with a violation of 108 subsection (1). 109 (b)âThere is a rebuttable presumption that the element of 110 knowledge is satisfied if the driver of the vehicle is a 111 registered owner of the vehicle. 112 Section 3.âParagraph (a) of subsection (1) of section 113 932.703, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 114 932.703âForfeiture of contraband article; exceptions.â 115 (1)(a)âA contraband article, vessel, motor vehicle, 116 aircraft, other personal property, or real property used in 117 violation of any provision of the Florida Contraband Forfeiture 118 Act, or in, upon, or by means of which any violation of the 119 Florida Contraband Forfeiture Act has taken or is taking place, 120 may be seized and shall be forfeited subject to the Florida 121 Contraband Forfeiture Act. A seizure may occur only if the owner 122 of the property is arrested for a criminal offense that forms 123 the basis for determining that the property is a contraband 124 article under s. 932.701, or one or more of the following 125 circumstances apply: 126 1.âThe owner of the property cannot be identified after a 127 diligent search, or the person in possession of the property 128 denies ownership and the owner of the property cannot be 129 identified by means that are available to the employee or agent 130 of the seizing agency at the time of the seizure; 131 2.âThe owner of the property is a fugitive from justice or 132 is deceased; 133 3.âAn individual who does not own the property is arrested 134 for a criminal offense that forms the basis for determining that 135 the property is a contraband article under s. 932.701 and the 136 owner of the property had actual knowledge of the criminal 137 activity. Evidence that an owner received written notification 138 from a law enforcement agency and acknowledged receipt of the 139 notification in writing, that the seized asset had been used in 140 violation of the Florida Contraband Forfeiture Act on a prior 141 occasion by the arrested person, may be used to establish actual 142 knowledge; 143 4.âThe owner of the property agrees to be a confidential 144 informant as defined in s. 914.28. The seizing agency may not 145 use the threat of property seizure or forfeiture to coerce the 146 owner of the property to enter into a confidential informant 147 agreement. The seizing agency shall return the property to the 148 owner if criminal charges are not filed against the owner and 149 the active criminal investigation ends or if the owner ceases 150 being a confidential informant, unless the agency includes the 151 final forfeiture of the property as a component of the 152 confidential informant agreement; or 153 5.âThe property is a monetary instrument. For purposes of 154 this subparagraph, the term âmonetary instrumentâ means coin or 155 currency of the United States or any other country; a travelerâs 156 check; a personal check; a bank check; a cashierâs check; a 157 money order; a bank draft of any country; an investment security 158 or negotiable instrument in bearer form or in other form such 159 that title passes upon delivery; a prepaid or stored value card 160 or other device that is the equivalent of money and can be used 161 to obtain cash, property, or services; or gold, silver, or 162 platinum bullion or coins; or 163 6.âThe property is a motor vehicle used in violation of s. 164 316.1935. 165 Section 4.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.